California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
-------------------------------------------

73260.

Any assessment which is levied pursuant to in this chapter is a personal debt of the producer so assessed. Failure of a handler to make payment of the collected assessment to the commission does not relieve the producer of this obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73261.

Any producer or handler who fails to file a return or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due and, in addition, 2 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [73301. - 73306.]

73301.

It is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or by both the fine and imprisonment, for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Willfully render or furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(b) When engaged in the shipping of navel oranges or in the wholesale or retail trade of navel oranges, fail or refuse to furnish to the commission or its duly authorized agents, upon request, information concerning the name and address of the persons from whom navel oranges have been received and the quantity so received.

(c) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be kept under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73302.

The commission shall establish procedures for the purpose of addressing any claims made against the commission or any of its individual members and alternates, and for the purpose of according individuals, including members and alternates, aggrieved by its actions or determinations an informal hearing before the commission or before a committee of the commission designated for that purpose.

Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the director. The determination of the director is subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73303.

The commission may commence civil actions and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties, and for the obtaining of injunctive relief or specific performance, with respect to this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted under this chapter.

Except in a proceeding to determine whether the director acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, upon a favorable verdict for the commission, the commission is entitled to receive reimbursement for any reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs. 

Venue for these actions may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73304.

Any action for any penalty or other remedy which is prescribed under this chapter shall be commenced within two years from the date of the alleged violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73305.

It is not necessary for the commission to allege or prove that an adequate remedy at law does not exist in any action brought under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73306.

This chapter shall be liberally construed.

If any section, clause, or part of this chapter is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid as applied to any person or as applied under certain circumstances, that decision shall not affect the remaining portions of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any other persons or under any other circumstance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [73351. - 73356.]

73351.

Between October 1, 1987, and September 30, 1988, the commission shall conduct a referendum among producers in the manner prescribed in Section 73202 to determine whether the operation of this chapter shall be reapproved and continued in effect.

If the director finds that a favorable vote has been given, he or she shall so certify and this chapter shall remain operative. If the director finds that a favorable vote has not been given, he or she shall so certify and declare the operation of this chapter and the commission suspended upon the expiration of the marketing season ending September 30, 1988. Thereupon, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and funds distributed in the manner provided in Section 73355.

No bond or security is required for the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73352.

Following a favorable referendum conducted prior to September 30, 1988, a referendum shall be conducted by the commission every fifth year thereafter between October 1st and September 30, following procedures provided in this article, unless a referendum is conducted as the result of a petition filed pursuant to Section 73353. In that case, the referendum shall be every fifth year following the industry petitioned referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73353.

Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the commission that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the director that the operation of this chapter be suspended. However, the suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the current marketing season.

The director shall, upon receipt of this recommendation, or may, after a public hearing to review a petition filed with him or her requesting the suspension, signed by 15 percent of the producers by number who produced not less than 15 percent of the volume in the immediately preceding marketing season, conduct a referendum among the producers to determine if the operation of the commission shall be suspended.

The director shall establish a referendum period, which shall not be less than 10 or more than 60 days in duration. The director may prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the established referendum period, the director shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period.

If at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the director participated in the referendum, the director shall continue the operation of this chapter, if he or she finds either one of the following: 

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of continuation, and the producers so voting marketed a majority or more of the volume of navel oranges marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of continuation, and the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the volume of navel oranges marketed in the preceding season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73354.

Prior to any referendum resulting from a petition filed in accordance with Section 73353, the petitioners shall deposit with the director an amount that the director deems necessary to defray the expenses of preparing the necessary lists and information and conducting the referendum. Any funds not used shall be returned to the petitioners who deposited the funds with the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73355.

After the effective date of suspension of the operation of this chapter and of the commission, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and any and all remaining funds held by the commission, collected by assessment and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating the operations of the commission, shall be returned upon a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding marketing season.

However, if the commission finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of a pro rata refund to these persons, any such funds remaining and any funds remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into an appropriate state authorized navel orange or citrus program. If no such program exists, the funds shall be paid into a federally authorized navel orange or citrus program. If no such program exists, the funds shall be paid into the State Treasury as unclaimed trust money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73356.

Upon suspension of the operation of this chapter and of the commission, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all producers affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Winegrowers of California Commission [74001. - 74196.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [74001. - 74009.]

74001.

The production and distribution of wine and winegrapes constitute an important industry of this state which provides substantial and necessary revenues for the state and employment for its citizens. It also furnishes an important food which benefits the public health and welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74002.

The maintenance and expansion of the wine and winegrape industry of California and of its local, national, and foreign markets is necessary to assure the consuming public of a continuous supply of these products and needed levels of income for those engaged in the wine and winegrape industry in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74003.

It is in the public interest that the public be made aware of accurate and scientific information relating to the beneficial qualities of wine, winegrapes, and winegrape products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74004.

The production and marketing of wine, winegrapes, and winegrape products produced in this state is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74005.

No action taken by the commission nor by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with the rules and regulations adopted under the chapter is a violation of the so-called Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Fair Trade Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16900) of that Part 2), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of that Part 2), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade. Proof that any action complained of was done in compliance with this chapter shall be a complete defense to the action or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74006.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74007.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that members of the commission are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry, and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that with respect to persons who serve on the commission, the particular agricultural industry is tantamount to, and constitutes the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74008.

A commission form of administration created by this chapter is designed to deal with the broad fields of market development, marketing research, and production and processing research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74009.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Dills-Bronzan Winegrowers Joint Commission Act of 1986.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [74021. - 74040.]

74021.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74022.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74023.

“Brandy” means an alcoholic distillate or a mixture of distillates obtained from the fermented juice, mash, or wine of whole, sound, ripe grapes or from the residue thereof, distilled at not over 170 degrees proof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74024.

“Commission” means the Winegrowers of California Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74025.

“Grape concentrate” or “concentrate” means unfermented grape juice from which the major portion of the original water content has been removed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74026.

“Grape juice” or “juice” means unfermented crushed grapes without solids containing the major portion of the original water content.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74027.

“Producer” and “grower” are synonymous and mean any person who produced winegrapes in a marketing season in a quantity of more than 25 tons. Unless otherwise exempted, producer also includes any person who receives winegrapes as payment for the use of his or her property in the production of winegrapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74028.

“Producer districts” shall consist of the following:

(a) District 1 consists of Lake, Solano, Mendocino, Sonoma, Marin, and Napa Counties.

(b) District 2 consists of the City and County of San Francisco, and Santa Barbara, San Luis Obispo, Ventura, Monterey, San Benito, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Alameda, San Mateo, and Contra Costa Counties.

(c) District 3 consists of Butte, Colusa, Glenn, Sacramento, Shasta, Tehama, Yolo, Yuba, Trinity, Siskiyou, Modoc, Lassen, Plumas, Sierra, Sutter, Humboldt, and Del Norte Counties, and that portion of San Joaquin County north of State Highway 4.

(d) District 4 consists of Merced, Stanislaus, Mariposa, Calaveras, Amador, El Dorado, Placer, Nevada, and Tuolumne Counties, and that portion of San Joaquin County south of State Highway 4.

(e) District 5 consists of Fresno, Alpine, Mono, Inyo, and Madera Counties, and that portion of Kings and Tulare Counties north of Nevada Avenue (Avenue 192).

(f) District 6 consists of Kern County and that portion of Kings and Tulare Counties south of Nevada Avenue (Avenue 192).

(g) District 7 consists of Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, Imperial, and San Diego Counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 128.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

74029.

“Ex officio member” means a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74030.

“High proof” means an alcoholic distillate or a mixture of distillates obtained from the fermented juice, mash, or wine of fresh winegrapes or from the residue thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74031.

“Market” means to sell, barter, trade, purchase, acquire, or otherwise distribute wine, winegrapes, or winegrape products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74032.

“Market development” includes, but is not limited to, trade promotion, public information, dissemination of information on health and social issues and other matters, and activities for the prevention, modification, or removal of trade barriers which restrict the free flow of winegrape products to market and may include the presentation of facts to state, federal, or foreign governmental agencies on matters which affect this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74033.

“Market research” means any investigation, development, analysis, or implementation of information relating to the marketing of wine, winegrapes, and winegrape products including, but not limited to, trade practices, consumer trends, promotion, sales, and advertising.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74034.

“Marketing season” or “fiscal year” means the period beginning July 1 of any year and extending through June 30 of the following years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74035.

“Must” means a mixture of unfermented crushed grapes, solid grape particles, and grape juice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74036.

“Production research” means research relating to the production and processing of winegrapes, including, but not limited to, the development of new winegrape products and uses for these products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74037.

“Vintner” and “processor” are synonymous and mean any person engaged in producing must, grape juice, grape concentrate, wine, or products thereof, including high proof and brandy, and includes a “winegrower” as that term is defined in Section 23103 of the Business and Professions Code, who produces wine from winegrapes. However, a producer does not become a vintner solely by the act of field crushing winegrapes before delivering the winegrapes as must to another person. A vintner who acquires and processes winegrapes in the preceding marketing season in a quantity of 100 tons or less is not subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74038.

“Wine” means the product obtained by the fermentation of winegrapes or juice therefrom, with or without addition or abstracting, and includes any product made from winegrapes which is defined as a wine and permitted under Part III (commencing with Section 5381) of Subchapter F of Chapter 51 of Title 26 of the United States Code, and in the statutes of this state and regulations issued thereunder defining wine produced from grapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74039.

“Winegrapes” means grapes produced in this state which are intended to be converted from their fresh form into grape juice, grape concentrate, wine, or products thereof, including, but not limited to, high proof and brandy produced from winegrapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74040.

“Winegrape products” include, but are not limited to, must, grape juice, grape concentrate, wine, high proof, and brandy produced from winegrapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Winegrowers of California Commission [74061. - 74078.]

74061.

There is in state government, the Winegrowers of California Commission. The commission shall be composed of 18 producers, 18 vintners, and may include one public member.

(a) Producers within District 7 shall elect one producer member; producers within Districts 2, 3, 4, and 6 shall each elect two producer members; producers within District 5 shall elect four producer members; and producers within District 1 shall elect five producer members to serve on the commission. Alternate producer members shall be elected in the same manner. Each producer member and alternate producer member shall be elected from the district in which he or she produces the greatest portion of his or her winegrape tonnage.

(b) Vintner members shall be elected by the industry at large and serve on the commission without reference to any county, district, or area of the state.

(c) The public member may be appointed to the commission by the director from nominees recommended by the commission.

(d) The director, and other appropriate individuals as determined by the commission, shall be ex officio members of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74062.

Periodically, the number of producer members and their respective alternate members serving on the commission from any district shall be reapportioned in a manner that assures representation in accordance with the value of winegrapes produced in each district. However, no district shall have less than one member nor more than five members on the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74063.

(a) The director may require the commission to correct or cease any existing activity or function which is determined by the director not to be in the public interest or which is in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the commission refuses or fails to cease these activities or functions or to make these corrections as required by the director, the director may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until the time that the cessation or correction of activities or functions as required by the director has been accomplished by the commission.

(c) Actions of the commission in violation of the written notice are without legal force or effect. The director, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions which are the subject of the written notice.

(d) Upon service of the written notice, the director shall notify the commission in writing of the specific acts which he or she determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter, the reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions, and may make recommendations that will make the activities or functions acceptable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74064.

The commission or the director may bring an action for judicial relief from the director’s written notice or for noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, as the case may be, in a court of competent jurisdiction which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other appropriate relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74065.

When the director is required to concur in a decision of the commission, he or she shall indicate his or her response to the commission within 15 working days from notification of the decision. The response may be a request that additional information be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74066.

The commission shall reimburse the director for all expenditures incurred by the director in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities pursuant to this chapter. However, the court may, if it finds that the director acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, relieve the commission of the responsibility for payment of the director’s legal costs with regard to that action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74067.

Each member of the commission, except the ex officio members, shall have an alternate member to be elected in the same manner as the member. An alternate member shall, in the absence of the member of whom he or she is an alternate, serve in place of the member on the commission and have and be able to exercise all the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission. In the event of death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member, the alternate shall serve as a member on the commission until a successor is elected and has qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74068.

Any producer member and his or her alternate member shall be a person, or an employee representing a producer, who has a financial interest in producing, or causing to be produced, winegrapes for market. The qualifications of producer members and alternate members shall be maintained during the entire term of office. No more than one member and his or her alternate members shall be employed by or connected in a proprietary capacity with the same producer. However, producer membership in an agricultural nonprofit cooperative association or trade organization shall not be considered employment or being in a proprietary capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74069.

Any vintner member and his or her alternate member shall be a person, or an employee representing a vintner, who has a financial interest in processing winegrapes for market. The qualifications of vintner members and alternate members shall be maintained during the entire term of office. No more than one member and his or her alternate member shall be employed by or connected in a proprietary capacity with the same vintner. However, vintner membership in an agricultural nonprofit cooperative association or trade organization shall not be considered employment or being in a proprietary capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74070.

The public member and his or her alternate member shall have all the rights, privileges, and powers of any other member of the commission. The public member shall not have any financial interest in the wine or winegrape industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74071.

The term of office of members and alternate members shall be for two years or until their successors have been elected and have qualified. However, of the first members of the commission, one-half of the vintner members and their alternate members shall serve for one year; one-half of the producer members and their alternate members and one-half of the vintner members and their alternate members shall serve for two years. The determination of the term of each member shall be made by lot. No member or alternate member shall serve more than four consecutive terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74072.

No less than 10 producer members and 10 vintner members, including alternate members when acting in place of the members, shall constitute a quorum of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74073.

The vote of a majority of the members, or alternate members when acting in the place of the members, present at the meeting at which there is a quorum shall constitute the act of the commission. However, for an affirmative vote to be valid, it shall include not less than five producer members and five vintner members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74074.

The commission shall be and is hereby declared and created a corporate body. It shall have the power to sue and be sued, to contract and be contracted with, and to have and possess all of the powers of a corporation. It may adopt a corporate seal. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be admissible in evidence in all courts of the state and shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74075.

The director or his or her representatives shall be notified and may attend meetings of the commission and any committee meetings of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74076.

No member of the commission or member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission shall receive a salary. Each member of the commission, except ex officio government members, and each member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission, may receive an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, as established by the commission. This amount shall be paid for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on special assignment for the commission, as approved by the commission. Members shall also receive necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74077.

All funds received from the assessments levied pursuant to this chapter or otherwise received by the commission shall be deposited in banks which the commission may designate and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through an agent or agents as it may designate. The agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, in favor of the commission, in an amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74078.

(a) The state is not liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission are limited to the funds collected by the commission.

(b) No member, alternate member, or any employee or agent of the commission, is personally liable for the contracts of the commission or for errors in judgment, mistakes or other acts, either of commission or omission, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. Liability is several and not joint, and no member, alternate member, or any employee or agent of the commission is liable individually for the default, act, or omission of any other member, alternate member, or any employee or agent of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [74091. - 74108.]

74091.

The powers and duties of the commission shall include, but are not limited to, all of those contained in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74092.

The commission may adopt and from time to time alter, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary bylaws, rules, regulations, operating procedures, and orders for carrying out this chapter, including appeals from any bylaws, rules, regulations, operating procedures, or orders of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74093.

The commission may administer and enforce this chapter and do and perform all actions and exercise all powers incidental to, in connection with, or deemed reasonably necessary for, proper or advisable effectuation of this chapter, including, but not limited to, entering into contracts for services with public and private agencies which are deemed necessary by the commission to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74094.

The commission may appoint its own officers, including a chairperson, one or more vice chairpersons, and other officers it deems necessary. The officers shall have the powers and duties delegated to them by the commission. The office of chairperson shall alternate annually between the producer members and the vintner members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74095.

The commission may employ a person to serve at the pleasure of the commission as president, and other personnel, including legal counsel, necessary to carry out this chapter. If the person engages in any conduct which the director determines is not in the public interest or which is in violation of this chapter, the director shall notify the commission of the conduct and request that corrective action and, if appropriate, disciplinary action be taken by the commission. If the commission fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the director, the director may suspend or discharge the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74096.

The commission may fix the compensation for all employees of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74097.

The commission may appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74098.

The commission may establish offices, incur expenses, enter into any and all contracts and agreements, create liabilities, and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments as may be necessary in the opinion of the commission for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74099.

The commission shall keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings, which shall be subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission with the concurrence of the director. A summary of the audit shall be made a part of an annual report to all producers and vintners, copies of which shall also be submitted to the Legislature and the department. In addition, the director may, as he or she determines necessary, conduct or cause to be conducted a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74100.

The commission may engage in market development and market research through plans and programs to enhance the sale of California wine, winegrapes, and winegrape products for the purpose of maintaining existing markets and creating new and larger domestic and foreign markets, and to educate and instruct the public with respect to the uses and value of California wine, winegrapes, and winegrape products. However, any plans and programs so developed and conducted shall not be directed towards a particular private brand or trade name, although private brands and trade names may be used in wine tastings and other similar programs authorized by the commission. In addition, the plans and programs shall make no use of false or unwarranted claims on behalf of California winegrapes or winegrape products, nor disparage the quality, value, sale, or use of any commodity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74101.

The commission may accept contributions of private, state, or federal funds that may be available for these purposes, and may allocate funds by contract or agreement to other persons or to state or federal agencies conducting this research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74102.

The commission may undertake appropriate research relating to the production and processing of wine and winegrapes, including the development of new winegrape products and uses for these products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74103.

The commission may publish and distribute bulletins or other communications relating to the California wine and winegrape industries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74104.

The commission may establish an assessment rate to defray operating costs of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74105.

The commission may establish an annual budget according to accepted accounting practices. The budget shall be concurred in by the director prior to disbursement of funds, except for disbursements made pursuant to Section 74096.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74106.

The commission shall submit to the director, for his or her concurrence, an annual statement of contemplated activities authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74107.

The commission may investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for suspected criminal violations of this chapter.
